Utah statutes.
41-6a-707.   Limitations on driving on left side of road -- Exceptions.

(1)  A person may not operate a vehicle on the left side of the roadway:

(a)  when approaching or on a crest of a grade or a curve on the highway where the person's view is obstructed within a distance which creates a hazard if another vehicle approached from the opposite direction;

(b)  when approaching within 100 feet of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing unless otherwise indicated by a traffic-control device or a peace officer; or

(c)  when the view is obstructed while approaching within 100 feet of any bridge, viaduct, or tunnel.

(2) Subsection (1) does not apply:

(a)  on a one-way roadway;

(b)  under the conditions described in Subsection 41-6a-701(1)(b); or

(c)  to a person operating a vehicle turning left onto or from an alley, private road, or driveway.

